en: Ginger and turmeric shots with orange\, apple\, and lemon
da: Ingefær- og gurkemejeshots med appelsin\, æble og citron
sv: Ingefärs- och gurkmejashots med apelsin\, äpple och citron

en: Fruit juices
bg: Плодови сокове
ca: Sucs de fruita
da: Frugtjuicer
de: Fruchsäfte, Fruchtsaft
es: Zumos de frutas, Zumo de frutas, Jugos de frutas
fi: Hedelmämehut
fr: Jus de fruits, jus de fruit
he: מיצי פירות
hr: voćni sokovi, sokovi, sok
hu: Gyümölcslevek, Gyümölcslé, Gyümölcs dzsúsz
it: Succhi di frutta
lt: Vaisių sultys, sultys iš 100% vaisių
nl: Vruchtensappen, Fruitsappen
pl: Soki owocowe
pt: Sumos de fruta
ru: Фруктовые соки
sv: Fruktjuicer, Fruktsafter, fruktsaft
th: น้ำผลไม้
tr: Meyve suyu
zh: 水果汁, 果汁

en: Mixed red fruits juice pure juice
fr: Jus de fruits rouges
hr: Sok od miješanog crvenog voća čisti sok
nl: Rood fruit vruchtensappen

en: Apple juices
ar: عصير تفاح
az: Alma şirəsi
bg: Ябълков сок, сок от ябълка
ca: Sucs de poma, Suc de poma
cs: Jablečný mošt
da: Æblejuicer, Æblemoster
de: Apfelsaft, Apfelsäfte
el: Χυμός μήλου
eo: Pomaj sukoj
es: Zumos de manzana, Jugo de manzana
et: Õunamahl
fa: آب سیب
fi: Omenamehut
fr: Jus de pomme, jus de pommes
ga: Sú úll
he: מיצי תפוחים
hr: Sokovi od jabuke
hu: Almalevek, Almalé
hy: Խնձորի հյութ
id: Jus apel
it: Succo di mela, Spremuta di mela
ja: リンゴジュース, りんごジュース, アップルジュース, アップル・ジュース
jv: Jus apel
ko: 사과 주스
lt: Obuolių sultys
lv: Ābolu sula
mk: Сок од јаболко
nb: Eplemost
nl: Appelsappen, Appelsap
nn: Eplemost
pl: Soki jabłkowe, Sok jabłkowy
pt: Sumos de macã, Suco de maçã
ru: Яблочные соки, Яблочный сок
sa: सेवफलरसः
sl: Jabolčni sok
sq: Lëngu i mollës
sr: Јабуков сок
sv: Äppeljuicer, Äppelmust
th: น้ำเอปเปิ้
tl: Yago ng mansanas
tr: Elma suyu
tt: Алма суы
uk: Яблучний сік
vi: Nước táo
zh: 苹果汁, 蘋果汁

en: Clementine juices
bg: Сок от клементина
de: Clementinensäfte
fi: Klementiinimehut
fr: Jus de clémentine, jus de clémentines
hr: Sokovi od klementine
hu: Klementinlevek, Klementinlé
it: Succo di mandarancio, Succo di clementina
lt: Klementinų sultys
nl: Clementinesappen, Clementinesap

en: Squeezed clementine juices, Pure clementine juice
fr: Jus de clémentine pur jus

en: Lime juices, Lime juice
bg: Сок от лайм
de: Limettensaften, Limettensäfte
fr: Jus de citron vert
hr: Sokovi od limete
hu: Limelé
ja: ライムジュース, ライム・ジュース
lt: Žaliųjų citrinų sultys
nl: Limoensappen
pl: Soki limonkowe

en: Squeezed lime juices, Pure lime juices
fr: Jus de citron vert pur jus
hu: Facsart limelé, Préselt limelé

en: Lime juices from concentrate
fr: Jus de citron vert à partir d'un concentré
hr: Sokovi limete iz koncentrata
nl: limoensappen uit concentraat

en: Lemon juice
bg: Лимонов сок
ca: Suc de llimona
de: Zitronensäfte
es: Zumo de limón
fi: sitruunamehu
fr: Jus de citron, jus de citrons, jus de citron pressé
hr: Sok od limuna
hu: Citromlé
it: Succo di limone
ja: レモンジュース, レモン・ジュース
lt: Citrinų sultys
nl: Citroensappen, Citroensap
pl: Soki cytrynowe, Sok cytrynowy
pt: Sumos de limão
ru: Лимонный сок
zh: 柠檬汁

en: Home-made lemon juice
bg: Домашен лимонов сок
de: Hausgemachter Zitronensaft
fi: Itsetehty sitruunamehu
fr: Jus de citron maison
hr: Domaći sok od limuna
hu: Házi készítésű citromlé
it: Succo di limone fatto in casa
lt: Namų gamybos citrinų sultys
nl: Huisgemaakte citroensap
pl: Domowy sok cytrynowy
ru: Домашний лимонный сок
zh: 自制柠檬汁

en: Squeezed lemon juices, Pure lemon juice
fr: Jus de citron pur jus
hr: Iscijeđeni limunovi sokovi
hu: Facsart citromlé, Préselt citromlé
pl: Wyciskane soki cytrynowe

en: Apple juices from concentrate, Reconstituted apple juices, Apple juices reconstituted from a concentrate
bg: Ябълков сок от концентрат
de: Apfelsäfte aus Konzentrat, Apfeldicksaft
es: Zumos de manzana procedentes de concentrado
fi: omenamehutiivisteet
fr: Jus de pomme à base de concentré, jus de pomme à base de jus concentré
hr: Jabučni sokovi iz koncentrata
hu: Almalé koncentrátumból, Almalé sűrítményből
it: Succo di mela da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos obuolių sultys, Obuolių sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Appelsappen op basis van concentraat, Appelsappen uit concentraat

en: Refrigerated apple juices, Refrigerated squeezed apple juices, Refrigerated pressed apple juices
de: Gekühlte Apfeldirektsäfte, Gekühlte gepresste Apfelsäfte
es: Zumos de manzana refrigerados
hr: Ohlađeni sokovi od jabuke
nl: Gekoelde appelsappen, Gekoeld geperst appelsap

en: Sparkling apple juices
fr: Jus de pomme pétillants, Jus de pomme gazeux
hr: Gazirani sokovi od jabuke
nl: Koolzuurhoudende appelsappen

en: Enriched apple juices
fr: Jus de pommes enrichés
hr: Obogaćeni sokovi od jabuke
nl: Verrijkte appelsappen

en: Flavoured apple juices
fr: Jus de pomme aromatisé
hr: Aromatizirani sokovi od jabuke
nl: Gearomatiseerde appelsappen

en: Squeezed apple juices, Pressed apple juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed apple juices, Non-refrigerated pressed apple juices, Pure apple juices
de: Apfeldirektsäfte, Direktsaft aus Äpfeln
es: Zumos de manzana exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de manzana exprimidos, Zumos de manzana exprimidos ambiente
fi: puristetut omenamehut
fr: Jus de pommes pur jus, jus de pomme pur jus, jus de pommes 100% pur jus, jus de pomme 100% pur jus, pur jus de pomme, pur jus de pommes
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od jabuka
hu: Préselt almalevek
lt: Išspaustų obuolių sultys, presuotų obuolių sultys, Grynos obuolių sultys
nl: Appelsappen (puur), Pure appelsappen
pl: Wyciskane soki jabłkowe, Tłoczony sok jabłkowy
pt: Sumos de maçâ espremida

en: Apricot juices from concentrate
de: Aprikosensäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de albaricoque procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus d'abricot à base de concentré, jus d'abricot à base de jus concentré
hr: Sokovi od marelica iz koncentrata
it: Succo di albicocca da concentrato
lt: Koncentruotos abrikosų sultys, Abrikosų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Abrikozensappen op basis van concentraat, Abrikozensap op basis van concentraat

en: Blueberry juices
bg: Сок от боровинки
de: Heidelbeersäfte, Blaubeersäfte
es: Zumos de arándanos, Zumos de arándano
fi: Mustikkamehut
fr: Jus de myrtilles
hr: Sokovi od borovnice
hu: Áfonyalevek
it: Succo di mirtillo
ja: ブルーベリージュース
lt: Mėlynių sultys
nl: Blauwe bessensappen, Blauwe bessensap
pl: Soki jagodowe, Soki borówkowe